Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
Recyclers

177.905.
Definitions for KRS 177.910 to 177.950.

As used in KRS

177.910

to

177.950

, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Road” means any county, state, federal or limited access highway or turnpike, including bridges and bridge approaches.

“Automobile, vehicle or machinery recyclers” means any place where five (5) or more junked, wrecked or nonoperative automobiles, vehicles, machines and other similar scrap or salvage materials, excluding inoperative farm equipment, are deposited, parked, placed or otherwise located, or any business as defined in subsection (3) where ten (10) or more junked, wrecked or nonoperative automobiles, vehicles, machines and other similar scrap or salvage materials are deposited, parked, placed or otherwise located.

“Business” means any person engaged as an automobile dealer, body shop operator, wrecker service operator, service station operator or other activity which may buy, sell or repair nonoperative vehicles, automobiles or machinery as a service.

“Material recyclers” shall mean any establishment or place of business, including garbage dumps and sanitary fills, maintained, operated, or used for storing, keeping, buying or selling of old or scrap copper, brass, rope, rags, batteries, paper, trash, rubber debris, waste, or motor vehicle parts, iron, steel, and other old or scrap ferrous or nonferrous material.

“Operator or operators” means a person, firm or corporation operating an automobile, vehicle, machinery or material recycling establishment or place of business or the allowing of such automobile, vehicle, machinery or material recycling establishment or place of business to be placed or deposited, or to remain on premises owned or controlled by such person, firm or corporation.

“Person” means any individual, firm, agency, company, association, partnership, business trust, joint stock company, body politic or corporation.

“Department” means the Department of Highways.

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of the Department of Highways.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 249, § 1; 1966, ch. 162, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(1); 1978, ch. 114, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 58, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1980, ch. 146, § 1, effective July 15, 1980.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

This section was amended by two 1980 acts which do not appear to be in conflict and have been compiled together.

177.910.
Unauthorized recyclers prohibited.

No person shall operate or cause to be operated any automobile, vehicle, machinery or material recycling establishment or place of business which is situated closer than one thousand (1,000) feet from the right-of-way line of any road unless a permit for such operation shall have been obtained from the department. The operation of any automobile, vehicle, machinery or material recycling establishment or place of business so situated without a permit is hereby declared to be a public nuisance.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 249, § 2; 1966, ch. 162, § 2; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(1); 1978, ch. 114, § 2, effective June 17, 1978.

Opinions of Attorney General.

An unmade city street and a city street are not within the junkyard prohibition.

OAG 63-551

.

An unmade city street and a city street do not come within the definition of “road” contained in KRS 177.905(1).

OAG 63-551

.

If a junkyard operator has a valid permit to operate a junkyard within 2,000 feet of the centerline of road “A,” the visibility of the junkyard from road “B” does not defeat that permit where road “B” is more than 2,000 feet from the junkyard.

OAG 78-82

(opinion prior to 1978 amendment).

A junkyard or recycling establishment, as defined in KRS

177.905

, found within the city limits and located closer than 1000 feet to the center line of any street which is part of any county, state or federal limited access highway or turnpike, is subject to the state statutes requiring a permit for the operation of such an establishment; establishments not subject to state regulation may be regulated by the city under its police power but it is doubtful that the city can prohibit entirely the operation of junkyards within the city limits as they are not normally considered to be nuisances per se.

OAG 82-205

.

The state’s authority relating to the issuing of permits for junkyards located closer than 1000 feet to the center line of any road would not include those areas involving city streets that were not a part of any county, state or federal highway system; a city of the fifth class, under its general police power, could then regulate, inspect and issue licenses for the operaton of those junkyards or recycling establishments within the corporate limits not coming under the coverage of the state act or which fell within the exception referred to in KRS

177.912

.

OAG 82-205

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Tippy, Roads and Recreation, IV. The Highway As Recreation, B. The Highway Beautification Act of 1965, 55 Ky. L.J. 799 (1967).

177.912.
Recyclers complying with zoning regulations.

An automobile, vehicle or machinery recycling establishment or place of business or material recycling establishment or place of business which complies as a conforming use in an industrially zoned area under the applicable zoning ordinances and regulations of any county or city, as determined in the discretion of the commissioner of highways, shall not be deemed to be in violation of KRS

177.905

to

177.950

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 162, § 7; 1978, ch. 114, § 3, effective June 17, 1978.

177.915.
Permit — Conditions — Screening.

The permit required by KRS

177.910

shall be issued in accordance with the administrative regulations of the department, promulgated pursuant to the provisions of KRS

177.905

to

177.950

, when it is shown to the satisfaction of the commissioner that an automobile, vehicle, machinery or material recycling establishment or place of business located closer than 1,000 feet from the right-of-way line of any road is, so far as deemed practical by the secretary, hidden from the view of motorists using such road by an artificial or natural screen, or is by virtue of natural topography so hidden. The screening required in this section may be effected by the construction of a fence, or by planting shrubs, trees, or flowering plants, the foliage of which shall, immediately upon planting, provide a sufficient screen or by making use of foliage already in existence. Any automobile, vehicle, machinery or material recycling establishment or place of business that cannot as a practical matter be screened, shall be required to be removed.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 249, § 3; 1966, ch. 162, § 3; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(1); 1978, ch. 114, § 4, effective June 17, 1978; 1988, ch. 211, § 1, effective July 15, 1988.

177.916.
Renumbered as KRS 177.912.

177.920.
Permit fee — Renewal — Proceeds.

The commissioner is hereby directed to charge a fee of fifty dollars ($50) for the issuance of a permit required by KRS

177.915

. Such permit shall be effective for a two (2) year period beginning July 1, 1962, through June 30, 1964, and each two (2) year period thereafter. Proceeds from such fees shall be paid to the State Treasurer and hereby are appropriated to the state road fund.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 249, § 4.

177.925.
Operator’s bond.

Where the commissioner has reasonable cause to doubt the financial responsibility of the operator or compliance by the operator with the provisions of KRS

177.905

to

177.950

, the commissioner may require such operator to furnish and maintain a bond in such form, amount, and with such sureties as he shall approve, but not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) conditioned upon the operator complying with the provisions of KRS

177.905

to

177.950

and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto. Any bond forfeiture is hereby appropriated to the state road fund.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 249, § 5.

177.930.
Operation of certain junkyards prior to June 14, 1964. [Repealed.]

177.935.
Powers of department.

The department is hereby empowered to:

Exercise general supervision of the administration and enforcement of KRS

177.905

to

177.950

.

Promulgate, pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A, administrative regulations pertaining to the operation of automobile, vehicle, machinery, or material recycling establishments or places of business as the commissioner may deem necessary to the administration and enforcement of KRS

177.905

to

177.950

.

Promulgate administrative regulations with respect to the sufficiency, type of material or foliage, height, density, and size of screening required by KRS

177.915

to insure the accomplishment of the purposes of KRS

177.905

to

177.950

.

Promulgate administrative regulations with respect to the procedural aspects of hearings, supplemental to KRS Chapter 13B, the filing of reports and orders, the issuance of permits and other matters.

Issue, after hearing, final orders abating the operation of an automobile, vehicle, machinery, or material recycling establishments or places of business in violation of the provisions of KRS

177.905

to

177.950

, or requiring the adoption of remedial measures including the construction or planting of screens or the utilization of natural screening, extension, modification, or addition to new or existing screens.

Issue, continue in effect, revoke, modify, or deny under conditions as the department may prescribe and subject to a hearing in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B, permits for the operation of an automobile, vehicle, machinery, or material recycling establishments or places of business.

Make investigations or inspections which may be deemed necessary by the commissioner to insure compliance with the provisions of KRS

177.905

to

177.950

, or with any administrative regulations or orders of the department which may be deemed necessary to enable the department to administer and enforce the provisions of KRS

177.905

to

177.950

.

Institute in a court of competent jurisdiction procedures, including injunctive relief, to compel compliance with the provisions of KRS

177.905

to

177.950

and with the final orders and administrative regulations issued pursuant thereto.

Enter at any reasonable time through any officer, assistant, agent, or employee in or upon any public or private property for the purpose of investigation and inspection of conditions relating to the operation of any automobile, vehicle, machinery, or material recycling establishments or places of business.

Perform any other acts as may be necessary, proper, or desirable in order to carry out effectively the duties and responsibilities of the department prescribed in KRS

177.905

to

177.950

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 249, § 7; 1966, ch. 162, § 4; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(1); 1978, ch. 114, § 5, effective June 17, 1978; 1996, ch. 318, § 64, effective July 15, 1996.

177.940.
Hearings.

Public hearings shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A by the department prior to the promulgation of any administrative regulations which pertain to the prevention, abatement, or control of automobile, vehicle, machinery, or material recycling establishments or places of business. Administrative hearings shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B before the issuance of any final order prohibiting the performance by any person of any act or acts deemed to be in contravention of any administrative regulations, orders, or permits of the department; or before denial, revocation, or modification of any permit provided for by KRS

177.905

to

177.950

; or before any other final determination is made by the department which directly affects the activities of any person.

The department shall grant an administrative hearing to any person, not previously heard in connection with the issuance of any order or the making of any determination, who may consider himself aggrieved by any order or determination and who shall file with the department a verified petition alleging that the order or determination is contrary to law or that is injurious to him, stating the grounds and reasons therefor and requesting a hearing thereon. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 249, § 8; 1966, ch. 162, § 5; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(1); 1978, ch. 114, § 6, effective June 17, 1978; 1996, ch. 318, § 65, effective July 15, 1996.

177.945.
Witnesses. [Repealed.]

177.950.
Judicial review.

Any aggrieved party may appeal the final order of the department following the hearing to the Circuit Court of the county in which the alleged offense occurred in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 249, § 10; 1966, ch. 162, § 6; 1968, ch. 152, § 120; 1996, ch. 318, § 66, effective July 15, 1996.

177.951.
Kentucky Auto and Truck Recyclers Licensing Advisory Board — Members — Meetings — Functions. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 114, § 7, effective June 17, 1978; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.